Tennessee, session 114, HB1269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-1-108(a), is amended by deleting
the last sentence of the subsection and substituting:
No family member of a voting member of the commission, including spouse, child
or children, father or mother, niece or nephew by blood or marriage, son-in-law or
daughter-in-law, shall be employed by any distillery, wholesale dealer, or retail
dealer, nor shall such family member of a voting member of the commission hold
or have issued to them any alcoholic beverage license in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1269
003307
- 1 -